Utah statutes.
17-50-335.   Energy efficiency upgrade or renewable energy system.

A county may provide or finance an energy efficiency upgrade or a renewable energy system, as defined in Section 11-42-102, in a designated voluntary assessment area in accordance with Title 11, Chapter 42, Assessment Area Act.



Enacted by Chapter 246, 2013 General Session

